Ohio, session 136, HB747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 9.97, 101.70, 107.43, 113.40, 117.15, 121.03, 141.01, 141.011, 3505.03, 3505.33, 3505.35, 3513.052, 3513.10, 3517.092, 3517.10, 3517.102, 3517.103, 3517.104, 3517.106, 3517.108, 3517.109, 4503.033, and 5703.01 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 9.97. (A) Any one of the governor, the lieutenant governor, the attorney general, the secretary of state, the treasurer of state, or the auditor of state, or the tax commissioner shall act as the applicable elected representative of the state for purposes of any federal law or United States treasury regulation that requires that bonds, notes, or other obligations of the state or any of its officers, boards, authorities, commissions, agencies, bodies, or other entities be approved by an applicable elected representative of the state or that other conditions be met in order for the interest income on such obligations to be exempt from federal income tax. (B) Any municipal corporation, township, or county which, pursuant to state law, created or participated in the creation of any board, authority, commission, district, agency, body, corporation, or other entity which is authorized to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations is hereby expressly authorized to act for such issuer as the governmental unit on behalf of which such issuer issues bonds, notes, or other obligations or as the next higher governmental unit from which the authority of that issuer is derived for purposes of any federal law or United States treasury regulation which requires that bonds, notes, or other obligations of such issuer be approved by the applicable elected representative of such governmental unit or that other conditions be met in order for the interest income on such obligations to be exempt from federal income tax. In the event more than one municipal corporation, township, or county participated in the creation of any such issuer, any one such municipal corporation, township, or county, upon request of the issuer for such approval, shall be deemed to be the governmental unit on behalf of which such issuer acts or the next higher governmental unit for purposes of the preceding sentence in this division. For purposes of this division, "applicable elected representatives" means, in the case of a municipal corporation and in the case of a county which has a single chief elected executive officer, its chief elected executive officer or any one or more other elected official of the municipal corporation or such county designated by such officer to act, as an alternative to action by himsuch officer, for the purposes set forth in this division. In the case of a township or county which has no single chief elected executive officer, the applicable elected representatives means, in the case of a township, its board of township trustees and, in the case of a county, its board of county commissioners, both of which act as the respective governmental unit's chief elected executive officer, or any one or more other elected official of each such governmental unit designated by the respective board to act, as an alternative to action by it, for the purposes set forth in this division. (C) Approvals under this section shall be based solely upon findings of fact made by the issuer, shall be solely for the purposes of satisfying requirements of the federal law and United States treasury regulations, shall be final and conclusive for such purpose, and shall not constitute an exercise of functions conferred by law upon the issuer, which functions shall remain in the issuer. (D) The authority granted by this section is in addition to and not a limitation upon other authorization granted by or pursuant to law or the constitution, and does not preclude any other actions by the designated or other bodies or officials which would satisfy the requirements of the federal law or United States treasury regulations, which actions are hereby authorized. Sec. 101.70. As used in sections 101.70 to 101.79 and 101.99 of the Revised Code: (A) "Person" means any individual, partnership, trust, estate, business trust, association, or corporation; any labor organization or manufacturer association; any department, commission, board, publicly supported college or university, division, institution, bureau, or other instrumentality of the state; or any county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of the state. "Person" includes the Ohio casino control commission, a member of the commission, the executive director of the commission, an employee of the commission, and an agent of the commission. (B) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, amendments, nominations, and any other matter pending before the general assembly, any matter pending before the controlling board, or the executive approval or veto of any bill acted upon by the general assembly. (C) "Compensation" means a salary, gift, payment, benefit, subscription, loan, advance, reimbursement, or deposit of money or anything of value; or a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally enforceable, to make compensation. (D) "Expenditure" means any of the following that is made to, at the request of, for the benefit of, or on behalf of any member of the general assembly, any member of the controlling board, the governor, the director of a department created under section 121.02 of the Revised Code, or any member of the staff of any public officer or employee listed in this division: (1) A payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, reimbursement, or gift of money, real estate, or anything of value, including, but not limited to, food and beverages, entertainment, lodging, or transportation; (2) A contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure, whether or not legally enforceable; (3) The purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value. "Expenditure" does not include a contribution, gift, or grant to a foundation or other charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. "Expenditure" does not include the purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value that is available to the general public on the same terms as it is available to the persons listed in this division, or an offer or sale of securities to any person listed in this division that is governed by regulation D, 17 C.F.R. 230.501 to 230.508, adopted under the authority of the "Securities Act of 1933," 48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C.A. and following, or that is governed by a comparable provision under state law. (E) "Actively advocate" means to promote, advocate, or oppose the passage, modification, defeat, or executive approval or veto of any legislation by direct communication with any member of the general assembly, any member of the controlling board, the governor, the director of any department listed in section 121.02 of the Revised Code, or any member of the staff of any public officer or employee listed in this division. "Actively advocate" does not include the action of any person not engaged by an employer who has a direct interest in legislation if the person, acting under Section 3 of Article I, Ohio Constitution, assembles together with other persons to consult for their common good, instructs a public officer or employee who is listed in this division, or petitions that public officer or employee for the redress of grievances. (F) "Legislative agent" means any individual, except a member of the general assembly, a member of the staff of the general assembly, the governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary of state, treasurer of state, or auditor of state, or tax commissioner, who is engaged during at least a portion of the individual's time to actively advocate as one of the individual's main purposes. An individual engaged by the Ohio casino control commission, a member of the commission, the executive director of the commission, or an employee or agent of the commission to actively advocate is a "legislative agent" even if the individual does not during at least a portion of the individual's time actively advocate as one of the individual's main purposes. (G) "Employer" means any person who, directly or indirectly, engages a legislative agent. (H) "Engage" means to make any arrangement, and "engagement" means any arrangement, whereby an individual is employed or retained for compensation to act for or on behalf of an employer to actively advocate. (I) "Financial transaction" means a transaction or activity that is conducted or undertaken for profit and arises from the joint ownership or the ownership or part ownership in common of any real or personal property or any commercial or business enterprise of whatever form or nature between the following: (1) A legislative agent, an employer of a legislative agent, or a member of the immediate family of the legislative agent or a legislative agent's employer; and (2) Any member of the general assembly, any member of the controlling board, the governor, the director of a department created under section 121.02 of the Revised Code, or any member of the staff of a public officer or employee listed in division (I)(2) of this section. "Financial transaction" does not include any transaction or activity described in division (I) of this section if it is available to the general public on the same terms, or if it is an offer or sale of securities to any person listed in division (I)(2) of this section that is governed by regulation D, 17 C.F.R. 230.501 to 230.508, adopted under the authority of the "Securities Act of 1933," 48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C.A. and following, or that is governed by a comparable provision under state law. (J) "Staff" means any state employee whose official duties are to formulate policy and who exercises administrative or supervisory authority or who authorizes the expenditure of state funds. Sec. 107.43. (A) As used in this section: "Administrative department" means a department listed under section 121.02 of the Revised Code. "Administrative department head" means a department head listed under section 121.03 of the Revised Code. "Internal management rule" means any rule, regulation, or standard governing the day-to-day staff procedures and staff operations within an administrative department or state agency, or within the office of an administrative department head or statewide elected officer. "Rule" means, unless the context dictates otherwise, any rule, regulation, or standard adopted, promulgated, and enforced by a statewide elected officer, administrative department, administrative department head, or state agency under the authority of the laws governing such officer, department, department head, or state agency. "Rule" does not include an internal management rule. "State agency" means any organized body, office, agency, commission, board, institution, or other entity established by the laws of the state for the exercise of any function of state government. "State agency" does not include a court. "State of emergency" has the meaning defined in section 107.42 of the Revised Code. "Statewide elected officer" means the governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, attorney general, and treasurer of state, and tax commissioner. (B) Beginning the day the governor declares a state of emergency, the governor and the department of health promptly shall report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives every action the governor or department takes in response to the state of emergency, including actions by the department or director of health under sections 3701.13 and 3701.14 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) If the governor declares a state of emergency, the general assembly may do any of the following by adopting a concurrent resolution: (a) Rescind, in whole or in part, any order or rule issued or adopted by an administrative department, administrative department head, state agency, or statewide elected officer in response to a state of emergency, including an order to authorize an agency to adopt, amend, or rescind rules under division (G) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. This division does not apply to an order issued to declare a state of emergency. (b) Invalidate, in whole or in part, an emergency rule adopted or amended by an agency in response to the state of emergency and pursuant to an emergency order the governor issues under division (G)(1) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code; (c) Authorize a rule rescinded by an agency under division (G)(1) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code in response to the state of emergency to be readopted, in whole or in part; (d) Invalidate, in whole or in part, an emergency rule adopted by an agency in response to the state of emergency pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (2) If the general assembly rescinds an order or rule, or a portion thereof, the administrative department, administrative department head, state agency, or statewide elected officer shall not reissue that order or rule, the rescinded portion, a substantially similar order, rule, or portion, or any restriction contained in the rescinded order or rule or rescinded portion, for a period of sixty calendar days following the adoption of the concurrent resolution by the general assembly, except as provided in division (C)(3) of this section. (3)(a) Within sixty calendar days of the general assembly rescinding an order or rule under division (C)(1) of this section, the governor, on behalf of an administrative department, an administrative department head, or a state agency, may submit a request to the general assembly to authorize an administrative department, an administrative department head, or a state agency to reissue a rescinded order or rule, rescinded portion thereof, a substantially similar order, rule, or portion, or any restriction contained in the rescinded order or rule or rescinded portion issued or adopted by an administrative department, administrative department head, or state agency. Upon review, the general assembly may adopt a concurrent resolution authorizing the request, in whole or in part. (b) Within sixty calendar days of the general assembly rescinding an order or rule under division (C)(1) of this section, a statewide elected officer may submit a request to the general assembly to reissue a rescinded order or rule, rescinded portion thereof, a substantially similar order, rule, or portion, or any restriction contained in the rescinded order or rule or rescinded portion issued or adopted by the statewide elected officer. Upon review, the general assembly may adopt a concurrent resolution authorizing the request, in whole or in part. (D)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, a person who challenges an order or rule adopted by an administrative department, administrative department head, state agency, or statewide elected officer that is issued or adopted in response to a state of emergency, in a civil action for damages, declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or other appropriate relief may do so in whichever of the following courts is applicable regarding the action: (a) If the civil action is for damages, the action may be brought only in the court of claims. (b) If the civil action is for declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or other appropriate relief other than damages, the action may be brought in an appropriate court located in the county where the person's residence or business is located or in the court of claims. (c) If the civil action is for damages and also is for declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or other appropriate relief, the action may be brought only in the court of claims. (2) If a person successfully challenges an order or rule adopted by an administrative department, administrative department head, state agency, or statewide elected officer that is issued or adopted in response to a state of emergency, the administrative department, administrative department head, state agency, or statewide elected officer shall pay the person's reasonable attorney's fees and court costs. (E) An order or rule issued or adopted in violation of this section is invalid and has no legal effect. Sec. 113.40. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Administrative agent of the board of deposit" means the treasurer of state. (2) "Financial transaction device" includes a credit card, debit card, banking card, prepaid or stored value card, or any other device or method for making an electronic payment or transfer of funds denominated in United States dollars. (3) "Processor" means an entity conducting the settlement of an electronic payment or transfer of funds, which shall be denominated in United States dollars. (4) "Revenue" includes fees, charges, tolls, costs, taxes, expenses, assessments, fines, penalties, payments, judgments, restitution ordered by a court, or any other amount a person owes to a state office under the authority of a state elected official or to a state entity. (5) "State elected official" means the governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary of state, treasurer of state, and auditor of state, and tax commissioner. (6) "State entity" includes any state department, agency, board, commission, or office under the authority of a state elected official that deposits funds into the state treasury or into an account in the custody of the treasurer of state. (B) Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code and subject to division (D) of this section, the board of deposit shall adopt a resolution authorizing the collection, receipt, and acceptance by the state of revenue, gifts, donations, or bequests made by a financial transaction device. The board of deposit's resolution also shall direct the administrative agent of the board of deposit to solicit proposals, within guidelines established by the board of deposit in the resolution and in compliance with the procedures provided in division (C) of this section; and to assist state entities and state elected officials in implementing any financial transaction device collection, acceptance, processing, receipt, and settlement program authorized pursuant to this section. The board of deposit's resolution applies to financial transaction device services related to any and all bank accounts comprising the state treasury as well as those in the custody of the treasurer of state but not part of the state treasury. (C) The administrative agent shall follow the procedures provided in this division whenever it plans to contract with one or more processors for the purposes of this section. The administrative agent shall request proposals for acceptance, processing, and settlement services, as appropriate in accordance with the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section. Prior to making the request for proposals available, the administrative agent shall advertise its intent to request proposals for two consecutive weeks by electronic publication on the administrative agent's web site made available to the general public. The notice shall state that the administrative agent intends to request proposals; specify the purpose of the request; indicate the date, which shall be at least fifteen calendar days after the initial publication, on which the request for proposals will be available and shall detail the service or services subject to the request for proposals. Upon receiving the proposals, the administrative agent shall review them and make a recommendation to the board of deposit regarding which proposal or proposals to accept. The board of deposit shall consider the agent's recommendation and then may choose to authorize the administrative agent, on the board's behalf, to contract with one or more of the processors submitting proposals, as appropriate. The administrative agent may enter into one or more contracts for the provision of payment, collection, acceptance, processing, receipt, and settlement services to the state entities and state elected officials. Through its administrative agent, the board of deposit shall provide any processor that submitted a proposal, but with which the board of deposit's administrative agent does not enter into a contract, notice that its proposal is rejected. (D) Each state elected official or state entity subject to this section shall use only the processors of financial transaction devices with which the board of deposit's administrative agent contracts, and each such state elected official or state entity is subject to the terms of those contracts. (E) The state elected official or state entity may establish a surcharge or convenience fee that may be imposed upon a person making payment by a financial transaction device. Any surcharge or convenience fee shall follow the guidelines of the processor or processors of financial transaction devices with which the board of of deposit's administrative agent contracts. If a surcharge or convenience fee is imposed, every state elected official and state entity accepting payment by a financial transaction device shall notify each person making a payment by such a device about the surcharge or fee. Notice to each person making a payment shall be provided regardless of the medium used to make the payment and in a manner appropriate to that medium. Each notice shall include both of the following: (1) A statement that there is a surcharge or convenience fee for using a financial transaction device; (2) The total amount of the charge or fee expressed in dollars and cents for each transaction, or the rate of the charge or fee expressed as a percentage of the total amount of the transaction, whichever is applicable. (F) If a person remits revenue to the state by a financial transaction device and the payment of the revenue is reversed for any reason, or if the value of the remitted payment in United States dollars at the time of receipt by the state elected official or state entity is less than the amount owed, the person is liable to the state elected official or state entity for the total amount of the state revenue and any reimbursable costs for collection, including banking charges, legal fees, or other expenses incurred by the state elected official or state entity in collecting the reversed payment. The remedies and procedures provided in this section are in addition to any other available civil or criminal remedies provided by law. (G) No person remitting any revenue by a financial transaction device to a state elected official or state entity shall be relieved from liability for the underlying obligation, except to the extent that the state elected official or state entity realizes the revenue to the state elected official or state entity in cash or its equivalent. If revenue is not remitted by the financial transaction device issuer, or by other means of payment, or by other guarantor of payment in the transaction, the underlying obligation survives and the state elected official or state entity shall retain all remedies for enforcement that would have applied if the transaction had not occurred. (H) A state elected official or employee of a state entity or state elected official who accepts a financial transaction device payment in accordance with this section and any applicable state or local statutes, laws, policies, or rules is immune from personal liability for the final collection of such payments as specified in section 9.87 of the Revised Code. (I) If the board of deposit determines that it is necessary and in the state's best interest to contract with an additional processor subsequent to the contract award made under division (C) of this section, the board may meet and choose to contract with one or more additional processors for the remainder of the period previously established by a contract award made under division (C) of this section. (J) The administrative agent, in cooperation with the office of budget and management, may adopt, amend, and rescind rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to implement and administer this section. (K) The treasurer of state shall have the authority to enter into such contracts necessary to fulfill its obligations as administrative agent for the board of deposit. Sec. 117.15. Once each year, or more often in histhe auditor of state's discretion, the auditor of state shall without previous notice audit the accounts and transactions of the office of the treasurer of state, ascertain the condition of the state treasury and the custodial funds of the treasurer of state, and make an inventory of the assets of the state treasury and the custodial funds of the treasurer of state. HeThe auditor of state shall sign histhe report completed under this section and submit one copy each to the treasurer of state, governor, attorney general, and secretary of state, and tax commissioner. An Such an audit report completed pursuant to this section is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until it is submitted to the officers enumerated in this section. Sec. 121.03. The following administrative department heads shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, and shall hold their offices during the term of the appointing governor, and are subject to removal at the pleasure of the governor. (A) The director of budget and management; (B) The director of commerce; (C) The director of transportation; (D) The director of agriculture; (E) The director of job and family services; (F) The director of children and youth; (G) The director of public safety; (H) The superintendent of insurance; (I) The director of development; (J) The tax commissioner; (K) The director of administrative services; (L)(K) The director of natural resources; (M)(L) The director of behavioral health; (N)(M) The director of developmental disabilities; (O)(N) The director of health; (P)(O) The director of youth services; (Q)(P) The director of rehabilitation and correction; (R)(Q) The director of environmental protection; (S)(R) The director of aging; (T)(S) The administrator of workers' compensation who meets the qualifications required under division (A) of section 4121.121 of the Revised Code; (U)(T) The director of veterans services who meets the qualifications required under section 5902.01 of the Revised Code; (V)(U) The chancellor of higher education; (W)(V) The medicaid director; (X)(W) The director of education and workforce. Sec. 141.01. Except as provided in section 141.011 of the Revised Code, the annual salaries of the elective executive officers of the state are as follows: (A) Governor, one hundred fifty-four thousand two hundred forty-eight dollars; (B) Lieutenant governor, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars; (C) Secretary of state, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars; (D) Auditor of state, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars; (E) Treasurer of state, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars; (F) Attorney general, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars; (G) Tax commissioner, one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred forty-seven dollars, beginning in the year 2031. These salaries shall be paid according to the schedule established in division (B) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code. Upon the death of an elected executive officer of the state listed in divisions (A) to (F) (G) of this section during the officer's term of office, an amount shall be paid in accordance with section 2113.04 of the Revised Code, or to the officer's estate. The amount shall equal the amount of the salary that the officer would have received during the remainder of the officer's unexpired term or an amount equal to the salary of the office held for two years, whichever is less. Unless a higher salary is explicitly established by statute, no officer or employee elected or appointed, and no officer or employee of any state agency or state-assisted institution except a state institution of higher education or the Ohio board of regents department of higher education for the positions of chancellor and vice chancellor for health affairs, shall be paid as an officer or employee, whether from appropriated or nonappropriated funds, a total salary that exceeds fifty-five thousand dollars per calendar year. This paragraph does not apply to the salaries of individuals holding or appointed to endowed academic chairs or endowed academic professorships at a state-supported institution of higher education or to the salaries of individuals paid under schedule C of section 124.15 or under schedule E-2 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. Sec. 141.011. (A) Each calendar year from 2020 through 2028, the annual salaries of the elective officers of the state as prescribed by divisions (A) to (F)(G) of section 141.01 of the Revised Code shall be increased as follows: (1) In calendar year 2020, by four per cent; (2) In calendar year 2021, by three per cent; (3) In calendar year 2022, by one and three-quarters per cent; (4) In calendar year 2023, by one and three-quarters per cent; (5) In calendar year 2024, by one and three-quarters per cent; (6) In calendar year 2025, by one and three-quarters per cent; (7) In calendar year 2026, by one and three-quarters per cent; (8) In calendar year 2027, by one and three-quarters per cent; (9) In calendar year 2028, by one and three-quarters per cent. (B) If the governor appoints the lieutenant governor as an administrative department head or as the head of an office within the office of the governor, the lieutenant governor may accept the salary for that office while serving as its head in lieu of the salary for the office of lieutenant governor. (C) Upon the death of an elected executive officer of the state listed in divisions (A) to (F) of section 141.01 of the Revised Code during that person's term of office, an amount shall be paid in accordance with section 2113.04 of the Revised Code, or to that person's estate. The amount shall equal the amount of the salary that the officer would have received during the remainder of the officer's unexpired term or an amount equal to the salary of that person's office for two years, whichever is less. (D) Beginning in the year 2031, the tax commissioner shall be paid a salary that has been increased in accordance with division (A) of this section. Sec. 3505.03. (A) On the office type ballot shall be printed the names of all candidates for election to offices, except the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, who were nominated at the most recent primary election as candidates of a political party or who were nominated in accordance with section 3513.02 of the Revised Code, and the names of all candidates for election to offices who were nominated by nominating petitions, except candidates for the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of a board of education, for municipal offices, and for township offices. (B) The face of the ballot below the stub shall be substantially in the following form: "OFFICIAL OFFICE TYPE BALLOT (1) To vote for a candidate record your vote in the manner provided next to the name of such candidate. (2) If you tear, soil, deface, or erroneously mark this ballot, return it to the precinct election officers or, if you cannot return it, notify the precinct election officers, and obtain another ballot." (C) The order in which the offices shall be listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state; provided that for state, district, and county offices the order from top to bottom shall be as follows: governor and lieutenant governor, attorney general, auditor of state, secretary of state, treasurer of state, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court, justice of the supreme court, United States senator, representative to congress, state senator, state representative, judge of a court of appeals, county commissioner, county auditor, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county treasurer, county engineer, and coroner. The offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be printed on the ballot in a manner that requires a voter to cast one vote jointly for the candidates who have been nominated by the same political party or petition. (D) Within the rectangular space within which the title of each judicial office listed in division (C) of this section is printed on the ballot and immediately below the title shall be printed the date of the commencement of the term of the office, if it is a full term, as follows: "Full term commencing _______(Date)_______," or the date of the end of the term of the office, if it is an unexpired term, as follows: "Unexpired term ending _______(Date)________" (E)(1) The names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office, and, except for absentee ballots or when the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office, shall be rotated from one precinct to another. On absentee ballots, the names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office and shall be so alternated that each name shall appear, insofar as may be reasonably possible, substantially an equal number of times at the beginning, at the end, and in each intermediate place, if any, of the group in which such name belongs, unless the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office. (2) The method of printing the ballots to meet the rotation requirement of this section shall be as follows: the least common multiple of the number of names in each of the several groups of candidates shall be used, and the number of changes made in the printer's forms in printing the ballots shall correspond with that multiple. The board of elections shall number all precincts in regular serial sequence. In the first precinct, the names of the candidates in each group shall be listed in alphabetical order. In each succeeding precinct, the name in each group that is listed first in the preceding precinct shall be listed last, and the name of each candidate shall be moved up one place. In each precinct using paper ballots, the printed ballots shall then be assembled in tablets. (F) Under the name of each candidate nominated at a primary election, nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, or certified by a party committee to fill a vacancy under section 3513.31 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the name of the political party by which the candidate was nominated or certified. Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as a nonparty candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "nonparty candidate." Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as an other-party candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "other-party candidate." No designation shall appear under the name of a candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested that no ballot designation appear under the candidate's name under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code, or who filed a nominating petition and failed to request a ballot designation either as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate under that section. (G) Except as provided in this section, no words, designations, or emblems descriptive of a candidate or the candidate's political affiliation, or indicative of the method by which the candidate was nominated or certified, shall be printed under or after a candidate's name that is printed on the ballot. Sec. 3505.33. When the board of elections has completed the canvass of the election returns from the precincts in its county, in which electors were entitled to vote at any general or special election, it shall determine and declare the results of the elections determined by the electors of such county or of a district or subdivision within such county. If more than the number of candidates to be elected to an office received the largest and an equal number of votes, such tie shall be resolved by lot by the chairperson of the board in the presence of a majority of the members of the board. Such declaration shall be in writing and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the board. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy thereof shall be posted by the board in a conspicuous place in its office. The board shall keep such copy posted for a period of at least five days. Thereupon the board shall promptly certify abstracts of the results of such elections within its county, in such forms as the secretary of state prescribes. Such forms shall be designated and shall contain abstracts as follows: Form No. 1. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of president and vice-president of the United States. Form No. 2. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of governor and lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court of Ohio, judge of the supreme court of Ohio, member of the senate of the congress of the United States, member at large of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States, district member of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States, and an abstract of the votes cast upon each question or issue submitted at such election to electors throughout the entire state. Form No. 3. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of member of the senate of the general assembly, and member of the house of representatives of the general assembly. Form No. 4. A report of the votes cast for judge of the court of appeals, judge of the court of common pleas, judge of the probate court, judge of the county court, county commissioner, county auditor, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county treasurer, county engineer, and coroner. Form No. 5. A report of the votes cast upon all questions and issues other than such questions and issues which were submitted to electors throughout the entire state. Form No. 6. A report of the votes cast for municipal offices, judge of the municipal court, township offices, and the office of member of a board of education. One copy of each of these forms shall be kept in the office of the board. One copy of each of these forms shall promptly be sent to the secretary of state, who shall place the records contained in forms No. 1, No. 2, No. 3, No. 4, and No. 6 in electronic format. One copy of Form No. 2 shall promptly be sent by electronic mail to the president of the senate of the general assembly. The board shall also at once upon completion of the official count send a certified copy of that part of each of the forms which pertains to an election in which only electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state voted to the board of the most populous county in such district. It shall also at once upon completion of the official count send a certified copy of that part of each of the forms which pertains to an election in which only electors of a subdivision located partly within the county voted to the board of the county in which the major portion of the population of such subdivision is located. If, after certifying and sending abstracts and parts thereof, a board finds that any such abstract or part thereof is incorrect, it shall promptly prepare, certify, and send a corrected abstract or part thereof to take the place of each incorrect abstract or part thereof theretofore certified and sent. Sec. 3505.35. (A) When the secretary of state has received from the board of elections of every county in the state Form No. 2, as provided for in section 3505.33 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state shall promptly fix the time and place for the canvass of such abstracts, and the time fixed shall not be later than ten days after such abstracts have been received by the secretary of state from all counties. The secretary of state shall notify the governor, auditor of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, and the chairperson of the state central committee of each political party of the time and place fixed. At such time and in the presence of such of the persons so notified who attend, the secretary of state shall canvass the abstracts contained in said Form No. 2 and shall determine and declare the results of all elections in which electors throughout the entire state voted. If two or more candidates for election to the same office, or two or more sets of joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, receive the largest and an equal number of votes, such tie shall be resolved by lot by the secretary of state. Such declaration of results by the secretary of state shall be in writing and shall be signed by the secretary of state. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy thereof shall be posted by the secretary of state in a conspicuous place in the secretary of state's office. The secretary of state shall keep such copy posted for a period of at least five days. Such declaration of results made by the secretary of state, insofar as it pertains to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, and attorney general, and tax commissioner, is only for the purpose of fixing the time of the commencement of the period of time within which applications for recounts of votes may be filed as provided by section 3515.02 of the Revised Code. (B) When the secretary of state has received from the board of elections of every county in the state Form No. 4 and Form No. 6, as provided in section 3505.33 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state shall promptly transmit by electronic mail or other telecommunication device a copy of each form to the administrative director of the supreme court. Sec. 3513.052. (A) No person shall seek nomination or election to any of the following offices or positions at the same election by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or by becoming a candidate through party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code: (1) Two or more state offices; (2) Two or more county offices; (3) A state office and a county office; (4) A federal office and a state or county office; (5) Any combination of two or more municipal or township offices, positions as a member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or positions as a member of a governing board of an educational service center. (B) The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code for: (1) Any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a state or county office; (2) Any municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. (C)(1) If the secretary of state determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (2) If a board of elections determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (D)(1) If the secretary of state determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall promptly investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (2) If a board of elections determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board of elections shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state promptly shall investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (E) When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section, on or before the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate according to the directions of the secretary of state. When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section after the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall not remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate. The board of elections shall post a notice at each polling location on the day of the applicable election, and shall enclose with each absent voter's ballot given or mailed after the candidate is disqualified, a notice that votes for the person for the office for which the person has been disqualified as a candidate will be void and will not be counted. If the name is not removed from the ballots before the day of the election, the votes for the disqualified candidate are void and shall not be counted. (F) Any vacancy created by the disqualification of a person as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section may be filled in the manner provided for in sections 3513.30 and 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (G) Nothing in this section or section 3513.04, 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.251, 3513.253, 3513.254, 3513.255, 3513.257, or 3513.261 of the Revised Code prohibits, and the secretary of state or a board of elections shall not disqualify, a person from being a candidate for an office, if that person timely withdraws as a candidate for any offices specified in division (A) of this section for which that person first sought to become a candidate by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, by party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (H) As used in this section: (1) "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Timely withdraws" means either of the following: (a) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for filing a declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition for the subsequent office for which the person is seeking to become a candidate at the same election; (b) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, if the person is seeking to become a candidate for a subsequent office at the same election under either of those sections. Sec. 3513.10. (A) At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy for nomination for any office, or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, each candidate, except joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, shall pay a fee as follows: 1 2 A For statewide office $100 B For court of appeals judge $50 C For court of common pleas judge $50 D For county court judge $50 E For municipal court judge $50 F For district office, including member of the United States house of representatives and member of the general assembly $50 G For county office $50 H For city office $20 I For village office $10 J For township office $10 K For member of local, city, or exempted village board of education or educational service center governing board $10 At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, the joint candidates shall jointly pay to the secretary of state a fee of one hundred dollars. (B)(1) At the same time the fee required under division (A) of this section is paid, each candidate shall pay an additional fee as follows: 1 2 A For the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor $50 B For statewide office $50 C For district office, including member of the United States house of representatives and member of the general assembly $35 D For member of state board of education $35 E For court of appeals judge $30 F For court of common pleas judge $30 G For county court judge $30 H For municipal court judge $30 I For county office $30 J For city office $25 K For village office $20 L For township office $20 M For member of local, city, or exempted village board of education or educational service center governing board $20 (2) Whoever seeks to propose a ballot question or issue to be submitted to the electors shall pay the following fee at the time the petition proposing the question or issue is filed: (a) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors throughout the entire state, twenty-five dollars; (b) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a county or of a district that consists of all or part of two or more counties but less than the entire state, fifteen dollars; (c) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a city, twelve dollars and fifty cents; (d) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a village, a township, a local, city, county, or exempted village school district, a precinct, or another district consisting of less than an entire county, ten dollars. (C) No fee shall be required of candidates filing for the office of delegate or alternate to the national convention of political parties, member of the state central committee of a political party, or member of the county central committee of a political party. (D) All fees required under division (A) of this section immediately shall be paid by the officer receiving them into the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund, in the case of fees received by the secretary of state, and into the county treasury to the credit of the county general fund, in the case of fees received by a board of elections. (E) The officer who receives a fee required under division (B) of this section immediately shall pay the fee to the credit of the Ohio election integrity commission fund created under section 111.29 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) In no case shall a fee paid under this section be returned to a candidate. (2) Whenever a section of law refers to a filing fee to be paid by a candidate or by a committee proposing a ballot question or issue to be submitted to the electors, that fee includes the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (G) As used in divisions (A) and (B) of this section, "statewide office" means the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, justice and chief justice of the supreme court, and member of the United States senate. Sec. 3517.092. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Appointing authority" has the same meaning as in section 124.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "State elected officer" means any person appointed or elected to a state elective office. (3) "State elective office" means any of the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, member of the general assembly, and justice and chief justice of the supreme court. (4) "Contribution" includes a contribution to any political party, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, or legislative campaign fund. (B)(1) No state elected officer, no campaign committee of such an officer, no employee of the state elected officer's office, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a state elected officer or to such an officer's campaign committee, and no state elected officer and no campaign committee of such an officer shall accept a contribution, from any of the following: (a) A state employee whose appointing authority is the state elected officer; (b) A state employee whose appointing authority is authorized or required by law to be appointed by the state elected officer; (c) A state employee who functions in or is employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the state elected officer. (2) No candidate for a state elective office, no campaign committee of such a candidate, no employee of the candidate's office if the candidate is a state elected officer or an elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a candidate for a state elective office or to such a candidate's campaign committee, and no candidate for a state elective office and no campaign committee of such a candidate shall accept a contribution, from any of the following: (a) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be the candidate, if elected; (b) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be appointed by the candidate, if elected, as authorized or required by law; (c) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, who will function in or be employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the candidate, if elected. (C)(1) No elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, no campaign committee of such an officer, no employee of such an officer's office, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to an elected officer of a political subdivision of the state or to such an officer's campaign committee from any of the following: (a) An employee of that political subdivision whose appointing authority is that elected officer; (b) An employee of that political subdivision whose appointing authority is authorized or required by law to be appointed by that elected officer; (c) An employee of that political subdivision who functions in or is employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as that elected officer. (2) No candidate for an elective office of a political subdivision of the state, no campaign committee of such a candidate, no employee of the candidate's office if the candidate is a state elected officer or elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a candidate for an elective office of a political subdivision of the state or to such a candidate's campaign committee from any of the following: (a) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be the candidate, if elected; (b) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be appointed by the candidate, if elected, as authorized or required by law; (c) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, who will function in or be employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the candidate, if elected. (D)(1) No public employee shall solicit a contribution from any person while the public employee is performing the public employee's official duties or in those areas of a public building where official business is transacted or conducted. (2) No person shall solicit a contribution from any public employee while the public employee is performing the public employee's official duties or is in those areas of a public building where official business is transacted or conducted. (3) As used in division (D) of this section, "public employee" does not include any person holding an elective office. (E) The prohibitions in divisions (B), (C), and (D) of this section are in addition to the prohibitions in sections 124.57, 3304.22, and 4503.032 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.10. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this division, every campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, and political contributing entity that made or received a contribution or made an expenditure in connection with the nomination or election of any candidate or in connection with any ballot issue or question at any election held or to be held in this state shall file, on a form prescribed under this section or by electronic means of transmission as provided in this section and section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, a full, true, and itemized statement, made under penalty of election falsification, setting forth in detail the contributions and expenditures, not later than four p.m. of the following dates: (1) The twelfth day before the election to reflect contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the twentieth day before the election; (2) The thirty-eighth day after the election to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the seventh day before the filing of the statement; (3) The last business day of January of every year to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the last day of December of the previous year; (4) The last business day of July of every year to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the last day of June of that year. A campaign committee shall only be required to file the statements prescribed under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section in connection with the nomination or election of the committee's candidate. The statement required under division (A)(1) of this section shall not be required of any campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity that has received contributions of less than one thousand dollars and has made expenditures of less than one thousand dollars at the close of business on the twentieth day before the election. Those contributions and expenditures shall be reported in the statement required under division (A)(2) of this section. If an election to select candidates to appear on the general election ballot is held within sixty days before a general election, the campaign committee of a successful candidate in the earlier election may file the statement required by division (A)(1) of this section for the general election instead of the statement required by division (A)(2) of this section for the earlier election if the pregeneral election statement reflects the status of contributions and expenditures for the period twenty days before the earlier election to twenty days before the general election. If a person becomes a candidate less than twenty days before an election, the candidate's campaign committee is not required to file the statement required by division (A)(1) of this section. No statement under division (A)(3) of this section shall be required for any year in which a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file a postgeneral election statement under division (A)(2) of this section. However, a statement under division (A)(3) of this section may be filed, at the option of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court, and no campaign committee of a candidate for the office of judge of any court in this state, shall be required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and in the next paragraph of this section, the only campaign committees required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section are the campaign committee of a statewide candidate and the campaign committee of a candidate for county office. The campaign committee of a candidate for any other nonjudicial office is required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section if that campaign committee receives, during that period, contributions exceeding ten thousand dollars. No statement under division (A)(4) of this section shall be required of a campaign committee, a political action committee, a legislative campaign fund, a political party, or a political contributing entity for any year in which the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file a postprimary election statement under division (A)(2) of this section. However, a statement under division (A)(4) of this section may be filed at the option of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. No statement under division (A)(3) or (4) of this section shall be required if the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity has no contributions that it has received and no expenditures that it has made since the last date reflected in its last previously filed statement. However, the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, on the date required in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, as applicable. The campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file a monthly statement of contributions received during each of the months of July, August, and September in the year of the general election in which the candidate seeks office. The campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file the monthly statement not later than three business days after the last day of the month covered by the statement. During the period beginning on the nineteenth day before the general election in which a statewide candidate seeks election to office and extending through the day of that general election, each time the campaign committee of the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or of a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general, or tax commissioner receives a contribution from a contributor that causes the aggregate amount of contributions received from that contributor during that period to equal or exceed ten thousand dollars and each time the campaign committee of a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court receives a contribution from a contributor that causes the aggregate amount of contributions received from that contributor during that period to exceed ten thousand dollars, the campaign committee shall file a two-business-day statement reflecting that contribution. Contributions reported on a two-business-day statement required to be filed by a campaign committee of a statewide candidate in a primary election shall also be included in the postprimary election statement required to be filed by that campaign committee under division (A)(2) of this section. A two-business-day statement required by this paragraph shall be filed not later than two business days after receipt of the contribution. The statements required by this paragraph shall be filed in addition to any other statements required by this section. Subject to the secretary of state having implemented, tested, and verified the successful operation of any system the secretary of state prescribes pursuant to divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of this section and division (F)(1) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code for the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission, a campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file a two-business-day statement under the preceding paragraph by electronic means of transmission if the campaign committee is required to file a pre-election, postelection, or monthly statement of contributions and expenditures by electronic means of transmission under this section or section 3517.106 of the Revised Code. If a campaign committee or political action committee has no balance on hand and no outstanding obligations and desires to terminate itself, it shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, with the official with whom it files a statement under division (A) of this section after filing a final statement of contributions and a final statement of expenditures, if contributions have been received or expenditures made since the period reflected in its last previously filed statement. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(7) of this section, each statement required by division (A) of this section shall contain the following information: (1) The full name and address of each campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity, including any treasurer of the committee, fund, party, or entity, filing a contribution and expenditure statement; (2)(a) In the case of a campaign committee, the candidate's full name and address; (b) In the case of a political action committee, the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section. (3) The date of the election and whether it was or will be a general, primary, or special election; (4) A statement of contributions received, which shall include the following information: (a) The month, day, and year of the contribution; (b)(i) The full name and address of each person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity from whom contributions are received and the registration number assigned to the political action committee under division (D)(1) of this section. The requirement of filing the full address does not apply to any statement filed by a state or local committee of a political party, to a finance committee of such committee, or to a committee recognized by a state or local committee as its fund-raising auxiliary. Notwithstanding division (F) of this section, the requirement of filing the full address shall be considered as being met if the address filed is the same address the contributor provided under division (E)(1) of this section. (ii) If a political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party that is required to file campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission under section 3517.106 of the Revised Code or a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly receives a contribution from an individual that exceeds one hundred dollars, the name of the individual's current employer, if any, or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any; (iii) If a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly receives a contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and salaries of two or more employees that exceeds in the aggregate one hundred dollars during any one filing period under division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section, the full name of the employees' employer and the full name of the labor organization of which the employees are members, if any. (c) A description of the contribution received, if other than money; (d) The value in dollars and cents of the contribution; (e) A separately itemized account of all contributions and expenditures regardless of the amount, except a receipt of a contribution from a person in the sum of twenty-five dollars or less at one social or fund-raising activity and a receipt of a contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and salaries of employees if the contribution from the amount deducted from the wages and salary of any one employee is twenty-five dollars or less aggregated in a calendar year. An account of the total contributions from each social or fund-raising activity shall include a description of and the value of each in-kind contribution received at that activity from any person who made one or more such contributions whose aggregate value exceeded two hundred fifty dollars and shall be listed separately, together with the expenses incurred and paid in connection with that activity. A campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall keep records of contributions from each person in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less at one social or fund-raising activity and contributions from amounts deducted under section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from the wages and salary of each employee in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less aggregated in a calendar year. No continuing association that is recognized by a state or local committee of a political party as an auxiliary of the party and that makes a contribution from funds derived solely from regular dues paid by members of the auxiliary shall be required to list the name or address of any members who paid those dues. Contributions that are other income shall be itemized separately from all other contributions. The information required under division (B)(4) of this section shall be provided for all other income itemized. As used in this paragraph, "other income" means a loan, investment income, or interest income. (f) In the case of a campaign committee of a state elected officer, if a person doing business with the state elected officer in the officer's official capacity makes a contribution to the campaign committee of that officer, the information required under division (B)(4) of this section in regard to that contribution, which shall be filed together with and considered a part of the committee's statement of contributions as required under division (A) of this section but shall be filed on a separate form provided by the secretary of state. As used in this division: (i) "State elected officer" has the same meaning as in section 3517.092 of the Revised Code. (ii) "Person doing business" means a person or an officer of an entity who enters into one or more contracts with a state elected officer or anyone authorized to enter into contracts on behalf of that officer to receive payments for goods or services, if the payments total, in the aggregate, more than five thousand dollars during a calendar year. (5) A statement of expenditures which shall include the following information: (a) The month, day, and year of the expenditure; (b) The full name and address of each person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity to whom the expenditure was made and the registration number assigned to the political action committee under division (D)(1) of this section; (c) The object or purpose for which the expenditure was made; (d) The amount of each expenditure. (C)(1) The statement of contributions and expenditures shall be signed by the person completing the form. If a statement of contributions and expenditures is filed by electronic means of transmission pursuant to this section or section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, the electronic signature of the person who executes the statement and transmits the statement by electronic means of transmission, as provided in division (F) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall be attached to or associated with the statement and shall be binding on all persons and for all purposes under the campaign finance reporting law as if the signature had been handwritten in ink on a printed form. (2) The person filing the statement, under penalty of election falsification, shall include with it a list of each anonymous contribution, the circumstances under which it was received, and the reason it cannot be attributed to a specific donor. (3) Each statement of a campaign committee of a candidate who holds public office shall contain a designation of each contributor who is an employee in any unit or department under the candidate's direct supervision and control. In a space provided in the statement, the person filing the statement shall affirm that each such contribution was voluntarily made. (4) A campaign committee that did not receive contributions or make expenditures in connection with the nomination or election of its candidate shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, on the date required in division (A)(2) of this section. (5) The campaign committee of any person who attempts to become a candidate and who, for any reason, does not become certified in accordance with Title XXXV of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, and who, at any time prior to or after an election, receives contributions or makes expenditures, or has given consent for another to receive contributions or make expenditures, for the purpose of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public office, shall file the statement or statements prescribed by this section and a termination statement, if applicable. Division (C)(5) of this section does not apply to any person with respect to an election to the offices of member of a county or state central committee, presidential elector, or delegate to a national convention or conference of a political party. (6)(a) The statements required to be filed under this section shall specify the balance in the hands of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity and the disposition intended to be made of that balance. (b) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for all statements required to be filed under this section and shall furnish the forms to the boards of elections in the several counties. The boards of elections shall supply printed copies of those forms without charge. The secretary of state shall prescribe the appropriate methodology, protocol, and data file structure for statements required or permitted to be filed by electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or a board of elections under division (A) of this section, division (E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. Subject to division (A) of this section, division (E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code, the statements required to be stored on computer by the secretary of state under division (B) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code shall be filed in whatever format the secretary of state considers necessary to enable the secretary of state to store the information contained in the statements on computer. Any such format shall be of a type and nature that is readily available to whoever is required to file the statements in that format. (c) The secretary of state shall assess the need for training regarding the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission and regarding associated technologies for candidates, campaign committees, political action committees, legislative campaign funds, political parties, or political contributing entities, for individuals, partnerships, or other entities, for persons making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or for treasurers of transition funds, required or permitted to file statements by electronic means of transmission under this section or section 3517.105, 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. If, in the opinion of the secretary of state, training in these areas is necessary, the secretary of state shall arrange for the provision of voluntary training programs for candidates, campaign committees, political action committees, legislative campaign funds, political parties, or political contributing entities, for individuals, partnerships, and other entities, for persons making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or for treasurers of transition funds, as appropriate. (7) Each monthly statement and each two-business-day statement required by division (A) of this section shall contain the information required by divisions (B)(1) to (4), (C)(2), and, if appropriate, (C)(3) of this section. Each statement shall be signed as required by division (C)(1) of this section. (D)(1)(a) Prior to receiving a contribution or making an expenditure, every campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall appoint a treasurer and shall file, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a designation of that appointment, including the full name and address of the treasurer and of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. That designation shall be filed with the official with whom the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. The name of a campaign committee shall include at least the last name of the campaign committee's candidate. If two or more candidates are the beneficiaries of a single campaign committee under division (B) of section 3517.081 of the Revised Code, the name of the campaign committee shall include at least the last name of each candidate who is a beneficiary of that campaign committee. The secretary of state shall assign a registration number to each political action committee that files a designation of the appointment of a treasurer under this division if the political action committee is required by division (A)(1) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code to file the statements prescribed by this section with the secretary of state. (b) The secretary of state shall not accept for filing a designation of treasurer of a political action committee or political contributing entity if, in the opinion of the secretary of state, the name of the political action committee or political contributing entity would lead a reasonable person to believe that the political action committee or political contributing entity acts on behalf of or represents a county political party, unless the designation is accompanied by a written statement, signed by the chairperson of the county political party's executive committee, granting the political action committee or political contributing entity permission to act on behalf of or represent the county political party. (2) The treasurer appointed under division (D)(1) of this section shall keep a strict account of all contributions, from whom received and the purpose for which they were disbursed. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.108 of the Revised Code, a campaign committee shall deposit all monetary contributions received by the committee into an account separate from a personal or business account of the candidate or campaign committee. (b) A political action committee shall deposit all monetary contributions received by the committee into an account separate from all other funds. (c) A state or county political party may establish a state candidate fund that is separate from all other funds. A state or county political party may deposit into its state candidate fund any amounts of monetary contributions that are made to or accepted by the political party subject to the applicable limitations, if any, prescribed in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. A state or county political party shall deposit all other monetary contributions received by the party into one or more accounts that are separate from its state candidate fund. (d) Each state political party shall have only one legislative campaign fund for each house of the general assembly. Each such fund shall be separate from any other funds or accounts of that state party. A legislative campaign fund is authorized to receive contributions and make expenditures for the primary purpose of furthering the election of candidates who are members of that political party to the house of the general assembly with which that legislative campaign fund is associated. Each legislative campaign fund shall be administered and controlled in a manner designated by the caucus. As used in this division, "caucus" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code and includes, as an ex officio member, the chairperson of the state political party with which the caucus is associated or that chairperson's designee. (4) Every expenditure in excess of twenty-five dollars shall be vouched for by a receipted bill, stating the purpose of the expenditure, that shall be filed with the statement of expenditures. A canceled check with a notation of the purpose of the expenditure is a receipted bill for purposes of division (D)(4) of this section. (5) The secretary of state or the board of elections, as the case may be, shall issue a receipt for each statement filed under this section and shall preserve a copy of the receipt for a period of at least six years. All statements filed under this section shall be open to public inspection in the office where they are filed and shall be carefully preserved for a period of at least six years after the year in which they are filed. (6) The secretary of state, by rule adopted pursuant to section 3517.23 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe both of the following: (a) The manner of immediately acknowledging, with date and time received, and preserving the receipt of statements that are transmitted by electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or a board of elections pursuant to this section or section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code; (b) The manner of preserving the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in the statements described in division (D)(6)(a) of this section. The secretary of state shall preserve the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in those statements for at least ten years after the year in which they are filed by electronic means of transmission. (7)(a) The secretary of state, pursuant to division (G) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall make available online to the public through the internet the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in all of the following documents: (i) All statements, all addenda, amendments, or other corrections to statements, and all amended statements filed with the secretary of state by electronic or other means of transmission under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, 3517.1014, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code; (ii) All statements filed with a board of elections by electronic means of transmission, and all addenda, amendments, corrections, and amended versions of those statements, filed with the board under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1012, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code. (b) The secretary of state may remove the information from the internet after a reasonable period of time. (E)(1) Any person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity that makes a contribution in connection with the nomination or election of any candidate or in connection with any ballot issue or question at any election held or to be held in this state shall provide its full name and address to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. The political action committee also shall provide the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. (2) Any individual who makes a contribution that exceeds one hundred dollars to a political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party or to a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly shall provide the name of the individual's current employer, if any, or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any, to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. Sections 3599.39 and 3599.40 of the Revised Code do not apply to division (E)(2) of this section. (3) If a campaign committee shows that it has exercised its best efforts to obtain, maintain, and submit the information required under divisions (B)(4)(b)(ii) and (iii) of this section, that committee is considered to have met the requirements of those divisions. A campaign committee shall not be considered to have exercised its best efforts unless, in connection with written solicitations, it regularly includes a written request for the information required under division (B)(4)(b)(ii) of this section from the contributor or the information required under division (B)(4)(b)(iii) of this section from whoever transmits the contribution. (4) Any check that a political action committee uses to make a contribution or an expenditure shall contain the full name and address of the committee and the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section. (F) As used in this section: (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of this section, "address" means all of the following if they exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name and number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, and zip code as used in a person's post-office address, but not post-office box. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of this section, if an address is required in this section, a post-office box and office, room, or suite number may be included in addition to, but not in lieu of, an apartment, street, road, or highway name and number. (c) If an address is required in this section, a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may use the business or residence address of its treasurer or deputy treasurer. The post-office box number of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may be used in addition to that address. (d) For the sole purpose of a campaign committee's reporting of contributions on a statement of contributions received under division (B)(4) of this section, "address" has one of the following meanings at the option of the campaign committee: (i) The same meaning as in division (F)(1)(a) of this section; (ii) All of the following, if they exist: the contributor's post-office box number and city or village, state, and zip code as used in the contributor's post-office address. (e) As used with regard to the reporting under this section of any expenditure, "address" means all of the following if they exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name and number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, and zip code as used in a person's post-office address, or post-office box. If an address concerning any expenditure is required in this section, a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may use the business or residence address of its treasurer or deputy treasurer or its post-office box number. (2) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. (3) "Candidate for county office" means a candidate for the office of county auditor, county treasurer, clerk of the court of common pleas, judge of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county engineer, county commissioner, prosecuting attorney, or coroner. (G) An independent expenditure shall be reported whenever and in the same manner that an expenditure is required to be reported under this section and shall be reported pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (C)(2)(a) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of this section, if, during the combined pre-election and postelection reporting periods for an election, a campaign committee has received contributions of five hundred dollars or less and has made expenditures in the total amount of five hundred dollars or less, it may file a statement to that effect, under penalty of election falsification, in lieu of the statement required by division (A)(2) of this section. The statement shall indicate the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of expenditures made during those combined reporting periods. (2) In the case of a successful candidate at a primary election, if either the total contributions received by or the total expenditures made by the candidate's campaign committee during the preprimary, postprimary, pregeneral, and postgeneral election periods combined equal more than five hundred dollars, the campaign committee may file the statement under division (H)(1) of this section only for the primary election. The first statement that the campaign committee files in regard to the general election shall reflect all contributions received and all expenditures made during the preprimary and postprimary election periods. (3) Divisions (H)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply if a campaign committee receives contributions or makes expenditures prior to the first day of January of the year of the election at which the candidate seeks nomination or election to office or if the campaign committee does not file a termination statement with its postprimary election statement in the case of an unsuccessful primary election candidate or with its postgeneral election statement in the case of other candidates. (I) In the case of a contribution made by a partner of a partnership or an owner or a member of another unincorporated business from any funds of the partnership or other unincorporated business, all of the following apply: (1) The recipient of the contribution shall report the contribution by listing both the partnership or other unincorporated business and the name of the partner, owner, or member making the contribution. (2) In reporting the contribution, the recipient of the contribution shall be entitled to conclusively rely upon the information provided by the partnership or other unincorporated business, provided that the information includes one of the following: (a) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the date of the contribution or contributions, and a statement that the total contributions are to be allocated equally among all of the partners, owners, or members; or (b) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the date of the contribution or contributions who is participating in the contribution or contributions, and a statement that the contribution or contributions are to be allocated to those individuals in accordance with the information provided by the partnership or other unincorporated business to the recipient of the contribution. (3) For purposes of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the contribution shall be considered to have been made by the partner, owner, or member reported under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) No contribution from a partner of a partnership or an owner or a member of another unincorporated business shall be accepted from any funds of the partnership or other unincorporated business unless the recipient reports the contribution under division (I)(1) of this section together with the information provided under division (I)(2) of this section. (5) No partnership or other unincorporated business shall make a contribution or contributions solely in the name of the partnership or other unincorporated business. (6) As used in division (I) of this section, "partnership or other unincorporated business" includes, but is not limited to, a cooperative, a sole proprietorship, a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited partnership association, a limited liability partnership, and a limited liability company. (J) A candidate shall have only one campaign committee at any given time for all of the offices for which the person is a candidate or holds office. (K)(1) In addition to filing a designation of appointment of a treasurer under division (D)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of any candidate for an elected municipal office that pays an annual amount of compensation of five thousand dollars or less, the campaign committee of any candidate for member of a board of education or the campaign committee of any candidate for township trustee or township fiscal officer may sign, under penalty of election falsification, a certificate attesting that the committee will not accept contributions during an election period that exceed in the aggregate two thousand dollars from all contributors and one hundred dollars from any one individual, and that the campaign committee will not make expenditures during an election period that exceed in the aggregate two thousand dollars. The certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall be filed not later than ten days after the candidate files a declaration of candidacy and petition, a nominating petition, or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(3) of this section, a campaign committee that files a certificate under division (K)(1) of this section is not required to file the statements required by division (A) of this section. (3) If, after filing a certificate under division (K)(1) of this section, a campaign committee exceeds any of the limitations described in that division during an election period, the certificate is void and thereafter the campaign committee shall file the statements required by division (A) of this section. If the campaign committee has not previously filed a statement, then on the first statement the campaign committee is required to file under division (A) of this section after the committee's certificate is void, the committee shall report all contributions received and expenditures made from the time the candidate filed the candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition, nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. (4) As used in division (K) of this section, "election period" means the period of time beginning on the day a person files a declaration of candidacy and petition, nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate through the day of the election at which the person seeks nomination to office if the person is not elected to office, or, if the candidate was nominated in a primary election, the day of the election at which the candidate seeks office. (L) A political contributing entity that receives contributions from the dues, membership fees, or other assessments of its members or from its officers, shareholders, and employees may report the aggregate amount of contributions received from those contributors and the number of individuals making those contributions, for each filing period under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, rather than reporting information as required under division (B)(4) of this section, including, when applicable, the name of the current employer, if any, of a contributor whose contribution exceeds one hundred dollars or, if such a contributor is self-employed, the contributor's occupation and the name of the contributor's business, if any. Division (B)(4) of this section applies to a political contributing entity with regard to contributions it receives from all other contributors. Sec. 3517.102. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.103 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and sections 3517.103 and 3517.104 of the Revised Code: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Statewide candidate" or "any one statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. (3) "Senate candidate" means a candidate for the office of state senator. (4) "House candidate" means a candidate for the office of state representative. (5)(a) "Primary election period" for a candidate begins on the beginning date of the candidate's pre-filing period specified in division (A)(9) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code and ends on the day of the primary election. (b) In regard to any candidate, the "general election period" begins on the day after the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which the candidate seeks an office specified in division (A)(1) of this section and ends on the thirty-first day of December following that general election. (6) "State candidate fund" means the state candidate fund established by a state or county political party under division (D)(3)(c) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (7) "Postgeneral election statement" means the statement filed under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by the campaign committee of a candidate after the general election in which the candidate ran for office or filed by legislative campaign fund after the general election in an even-numbered year. (8) "Contribution" means any contribution that is required to be reported in the statement of contributions under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (9)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(9)(b) of this section, "designated state campaign committee" means: (i) In the case of contributions to or from a state political party, a campaign committee of a statewide candidate, statewide officeholder, senate candidate, house candidate, or member of the general assembly. (ii) In the case of contributions to or from a county political party, a campaign committee of a senate candidate or house candidate whose candidacy is to be submitted to some or all of the electors in that county, or member of the general assembly whose district contains all or part of that county. (iii) In the case of contributions to or from a legislative campaign fund, a campaign committee of any of the following: (I) A senate or house candidate who, if elected, will be a member of the same party that established the legislative campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative campaign fund is associated; (II) A state senator or state representative who is a member of the same party that established the legislative campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative campaign fund is associated. (b) A campaign committee is no longer a "designated state campaign committee" after the campaign committee's candidate changes the designation of treasurer required to be filed under division (D)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code to indicate that the person intends to be a candidate for, or becomes a candidate for nomination or election to, any office that, if elected, would not qualify that candidate's campaign committee as a "designated state campaign committee" under division (A)(9)(a) of this section. (B)(1)(a) No individual who is seven years of age or older shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Ten thousand dollars to a county political party of the county in which the individual's designated Ohio residence is located for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (v) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (vi) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee in a calendar year; (viii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (b) No individual shall make a contribution or contributions to the state candidate fund of a county political party of any county other than the county in which the individual's designated Ohio residence is located. (c) No individual who is under seven years of age shall make any contribution. (2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political action committee shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political action committee or to a political contributing entity in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political action committee that makes a contribution to a political action committee or a political contributing entity affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political action committee is affiliated with another political action committee or with a political contributing entity if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (b) No political action committee shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (3) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (a) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (b) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (c) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (d) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee in a calendar year; (e) Ten thousand dollars to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (4)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no political party shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee or to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (b) No county political party shall make a contribution or contributions to another county political party. (5)(a) Subject to division (B)(5)(b) of this section, no campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating in a calendar year more than: (i) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund; (ii) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to any one county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (b) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund unless one of the following applies: (i) The campaign committee's candidate will appear on a ballot in that county. (ii) The campaign committee's candidate is the holder of an elected public office that represents all or part of the population of that county at the time the contribution is made. (6)(a) No state candidate fund of a county political party shall make a contribution or contributions, except a contribution or contributions to a designated state campaign committee, in a primary election period or a general election period, aggregating more than: (i) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (b)(i) No state candidate fund of a state or county political party shall make a transfer or a contribution or transfers or contributions of cash or cash equivalents to a designated state campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period aggregating more than: (I) Five hundred thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate; (II) One hundred thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (III) Fifty thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (ii) No legislative campaign fund shall make a transfer or a contribution or transfers or contributions of cash or cash equivalents to a designated state campaign committee aggregating more than: (I) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (II) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (iii) As used in divisions (B)(6)(b) and (C)(6) of this section, "transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents" does not include any in-kind contributions. (c) A county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand may make one or more contributions from other accounts to any one statewide candidate or to any one designated state campaign committee that do not exceed, in the aggregate, two thousand five hundred dollars in any primary election period or general election period. (d) No legislative campaign fund shall make a contribution, other than to a designated state campaign committee or to the state candidate fund of a political party. (7)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political contributing entity shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political contributing entity or to a political action committee in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political contributing entity that makes a contribution to a political contributing entity or a political action committee affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political contributing entity is affiliated with another political contributing entity or with a political action committee if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (b) No political contributing entity shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (C)(1)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall do any of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars from any one or combination of state candidate funds of county political parties in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign committee of a senate candidate shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a senate candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (3)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign committee of a house candidate shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a house candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (4)(a)(i) Subject to division (C)(4)(a)(ii) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no county political party shall knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age, or accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual whose designated Ohio residence is located within that county and who is seven years of age or older or from any one campaign committee in a calendar year. (ii) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no county political party shall accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund from any individual whose designated Ohio residence is located outside of that county and who is seven years of age or older, from any campaign committee unless the campaign committee's candidate will appear on a ballot in that county or unless the campaign committee's candidate is the holder of an elected public office that represents all or part of the population of that county at the time the contribution is accepted, or from any political action committee or any political contributing entity. (iii) No county political party shall accept a contribution or contributions from any other county political party. (b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no state political party shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund aggregating more than thirty thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, in a calendar year. (5) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no legislative campaign fund shall do either of the following: (a) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (b) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than fifteen thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, in a calendar year. (6)(a) No designated state campaign committee shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a state candidate fund of a state political party aggregating in a primary election period or a general election period more than: (i) Five hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a statewide candidate; (ii) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (iii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (b) No designated state campaign committee shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a legislative campaign fund aggregating more than: (i) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (ii) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (c) No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly, including a designated state campaign committee, shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from any one or combination of state candidate funds of county political parties aggregating in a primary election period or a general election period more than: (i) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (ii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (7)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no political action committee and no political contributing entity shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one campaign committee, or from any one political party in a calendar year. (b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political action committee shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from another political action committee or from a political contributing entity in a calendar year. Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political contributing entity shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from another political contributing entity or from a political action committee in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political action committee or political contributing entity that accepts a contribution from a political action committee or political contributing entity affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political action committee is affiliated with another political action committee or with a political contributing entity if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (D)(1)(a) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in division (B)(2) of this section and the limitations prescribed in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from political action committees that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or that are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political action committee. (b) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in division (B)(7) of this section and the limitations prescribed in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from political contributing entities that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or that are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political contributing entity. (2) As used in divisions (B)(1)(a)(vii), (B)(3)(d), (B)(4)(a), and (C)(7) of this section, "political action committee" does not include a political action committee that is organized to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes no contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity. As used in divisions (B)(1)(a)(viii), (B)(3)(e), (B)(4)(a), and (C)(7) of this section, "political contributing entity" does not include a political contributing entity that is organized to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes no contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity. (3) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in divisions (B)(4) and (C)(7)(a) of this section, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from a national political party, a state political party, and a county political party are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political party and shall be combined with each other to determine whether the limitations have been exceeded. (E)(1) If a legislative campaign fund has kept a total amount of contributions exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, the legislative campaign fund shall comply with division (E)(2) of this section. (2)(a) Any legislative campaign fund that has kept a total amount of contributions in excess of the amount specified in division (E)(1) of this section at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code shall dispose of the excess amount in the manner prescribed in division (E)(2)(b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section not later than ninety days after the day the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. Any legislative campaign fund that is required to dispose of an excess amount of contributions under this division shall file a statement on the ninetieth day after the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code indicating the total amount of contributions the fund has at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and that the excess contributions were disposed of pursuant to this division and division (E)(2)(b) of this section. The statement shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain any additional information the secretary of state considers necessary. (b) Any legislative campaign fund that is required to dispose of an excess amount of contributions under division (E)(2) of this section shall dispose of that excess amount by doing any of the following: (i) Giving the amount to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio election integrity commission fund created by section 111.29 of the Revised Code; (ii) Giving the amount to individuals who made contributions to that legislative campaign fund as a refund of all or part of their contributions; (iii) Giving the amount to a corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. (F)(1) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to file a statement required by division (E) of this section. (2) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to dispose of excess contributions as required by division (E) of this section. (G) Nothing in this section shall affect, be used in determining, or supersede a limitation on campaign contributions as provided for in the Federal Election Campaign Act. Sec. 3517.103. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general, or tax commissioner. (2)(a) "Personal funds" means contributions to the campaign committee of a candidate by the candidate. (b) A loan obtained by, guaranteed by, or for the benefit of a statewide candidate, senate candidate, or house candidate shall be considered "personal funds" subject to the provisions of this section to the extent that the loan is obtained or guaranteed by the candidate. A loan that is obtained or guaranteed and that is for the benefit of a statewide candidate, senate candidate, or house candidate shall not be considered "personal funds" for the purposes of this section but shall be considered to be a "contribution" for the purposes of this chapter if the loan is obtained or guaranteed by anyone other than the candidate. (c) When a debt or other obligation incurred by a committee or by a candidate on behalf of the candidate's committee is to be paid from "personal funds," those funds are considered to be expended when the debt or other obligation is incurred, regardless of when it is paid. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, no statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly shall make an expenditure of personal funds to influence the results of an election for that candidate's nomination or election to office unless the personal funds are first deposited into the campaign fund of that candidate's campaign committee. (2) A statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly may make an expenditure of personal funds without first depositing those funds into the campaign committee's funds as long as the aggregate total of those expenditures does not exceed five hundred dollars at any time during an election period. After the candidate's campaign committee reimburses the candidate for any direct expenditure of personal funds, the amount that was reimbursed is no longer included in the aggregate total of expenditures of personal funds subject to the five-hundred-dollar limit. Sec. 3517.104. (A) In January of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state, in accordance with this division and division (B) of this section, shall adjust each amount specified in section 3517.102, in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10, and in division (B) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code. The adjustment shall be based on the yearly average of the previous two years of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successive equivalent, as determined by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its successor in responsibility, for all items, Series A. Using the 1996 yearly average as the base year, the secretary of state shall compare the most current average consumer price index with that determined in the preceding odd-numbered year, and shall determine the percentage increase or decrease. The percentage increase or decrease shall be multiplied by the actual dollar figure for each office or entity specified in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code and by each actual dollar figure specified in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 and in division (B) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code as determined in the previous odd-numbered year, and the product shall be added to or subtracted from its corresponding actual dollar figure, as necessary, for that previous odd-numbered year. The resulting amount shall be rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars if the calculations are made regarding the amounts specified in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. If the calculations are made regarding the amounts specified in section 3517.101 or 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the resulting amount shall not be rounded. If that resulting amount is less than one hundred dollars, the secretary of state shall retain a record of the resulting amount and the manner in which it was calculated, but shall not make an adjustment unless the resulting amount, when added to the resulting amount calculated in each prior odd-numbered year since the last adjustment was made, equals or exceeds one hundred dollars. (B)(1) The secretary of state shall calculate the adjustment under division (A) of this section and shall report the calculations and necessary materials to the auditor of state, on or before the thirty-first day of January of each odd-numbered year. The secretary of state shall base the adjustment on the most current consumer price index that is described in division (A) of this section and that is in effect as of the first day of January of each odd-numbered year. (2) The calculations made by the secretary of state under divisions (A) and (B)(1) of this section shall be certified by the auditor of state on or before the fifteenth day of February of each odd-numbered year. (3) On or before the twenty-fifth day of February of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state shall prepare a report setting forth the maximum contribution limitations under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the maximum amounts, if any, of contributions permitted to be kept under that section, the amounts required under division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code for reporting contributions and in-kind contributions at social or fund-raising activities and contributions from amounts deducted from an employee's wages and salary, and the maximum office facility gift limitations under section 3517.101 of the Revised Code, as calculated and certified pursuant to divisions (A) and (B)(1) and (2) of this section. The report and all documents relating to the calculations contained in the report are public records. The report shall contain an indication of the period in which the limitations, the maximum contribution or gift amounts, and the reporting amounts apply, a summary of how the limitations, the maximum contribution or gift amounts, and the reporting amounts were calculated, and a statement that the report and all related documents are available for inspection and copying at the office of the secretary of state. (4) On or before the twenty-fifth day of February of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state shall transmit the report to the general assembly and shall send the report by mail to the board of elections of each county. (5) The secretary of state shall send the report by mail to each person who files a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition with the secretary of state for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. The report shall be mailed on or before the tenth day after the filing. (6) A board of elections shall send the report by mail to each person who files a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition with the board for the office of state representative or state senator. The report shall be mailed on or before the tenth day after the filing. Sec. 3517.106. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Statewide office" means any of the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Addendum to a statement" includes an amendment or other correction to that statement. (B) The secretary of state shall store all of the following information on computer: (1) The information contained in statements of contributions and expenditures and monthly statements required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and in statements of independent expenditures required to be filed under section 3517.105 of the Revised Code with the secretary of state and the information transmitted to the secretary of state by boards of elections under division (E)(2) of this section; (2) The information contained in disclosure of electioneering communications statements required to be filed under section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code; (3) The information contained in deposit and disbursement statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary of state under section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; (4) The gift and disbursement information contained in statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary of state under section 3517.1013 of the Revised Code; (5) The information contained in donation and disbursement statements required to be filed with the office of the secretary of state under section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The secretary of state shall make available to the campaign committees, political action committees, political contributing entities, legislative campaign funds, political parties, individuals, partnerships, corporations, labor organizations, treasurers of transition funds, and other entities that are permitted or required to file statements by electronic means of transmission, and to members of the news media and other interested persons, for a reasonable fee, computer programs that are compatible with the secretary of state's method of storing the information contained in the statements. (2) The secretary of state shall make the information required to be stored under division (B) of this section available on computer at the secretary of state's office so that, to the maximum extent feasible, individuals may obtain at the secretary of state's office any part or all of that information for any given year, subject to the limitation expressed in division (D) of this section. (D) The secretary of state shall keep the information stored on computer under division (B) of this section for at least six years. (E)(1) Subject to division (J) of this section and subject to the secretary of state having implemented, tested, and verified the successful operation of any system the secretary of state prescribes pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section and divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code for the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission, each of the following entities shall be permitted or required to file statements by electronic means of transmission, as applicable: (a) The campaign committee of each candidate for statewide office may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission or, if the total amount of the contributions received or the total amount of the expenditures made by the campaign committee for the applicable reporting period as specified in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code exceeds ten thousand dollars, shall file those statements by electronic means of transmission. (b) A campaign committee of a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly or a campaign committee of a candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code or by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state or, if the total amount of the contributions received by the campaign committee for the applicable reporting period as specified in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code exceeds ten thousand dollars, shall file those statements by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state. (c) A campaign committee of a candidate for an office other than a statewide office, the office of member of the general assembly, or the office of judge of a court of appeals may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or the board of elections, as applicable. (d) A political action committee and a political contributing entity described in division (A)(1) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code, a legislative campaign fund, and a state political party may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state or, if the total amount of the contributions received or the total amount of the expenditures made by the political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or state political party for the applicable reporting period as specified in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code exceeds ten thousand dollars, shall file those statements by electronic means of transmission. (e) A county political party shall file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with respect to its state candidate fund by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state. (f) A county political party may file all other statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission to the board of elections. (g) A political action committee or political contributing entity described in division (A)(3) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code may file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by electronic means of transmission to the board of elections. (h) Any individual, partnership, or other entity that makes independent expenditures in support of or opposition to a statewide candidate or a statewide ballot issue or question as provided in division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code may file the statement specified in that division by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state or, if the total amount of independent expenditures made during the reporting period under that division exceeds ten thousand dollars, shall file the statement specified in that division by electronic means of transmission. (i) Any individual, partnership, or other entity that makes independent expenditures in support of or opposition to a candidate or ballot issue other than a statewide candidate or a statewide ballot issue as provided in division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code may file the statement specified in that division by electronic means of transmission to the board of elections. (2) A board of elections that receives a statement by electronic means of transmission shall transmit that statement to the secretary of state within five business days after receiving the statement. If the board receives an addendum or an amended statement from an entity that filed a statement with the board by electronic means of transmission, the board shall transmit the addendum or amended statement to the secretary of state not later than the close of business on the day the board received the addendum or amended statement. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(3)(b) of this section, within five business days after a statement filed under division (E)(1) of this section is received by the secretary of state by electronic or other means of transmission, the secretary of state shall make available online to the public through the internet, as provided in division (G) of this section, the contribution and expenditure information in that statement. (b) The secretary of state shall not make available online to the public through the internet any contribution or expenditure information contained in a statement for any candidate until the secretary of state is able to make available online to the public through the internet the contribution and expenditure information for all candidates for a particular office, or until the applicable filing deadline for that statement has passed, whichever is sooner. As soon as the secretary of state has available all of the contribution and expenditure information for all candidates for a particular office, or as soon as the applicable filing deadline for a statement has passed, whichever is sooner, the secretary of state shall simultaneously make available online to the public through the internet the information for all candidates for that office. (4)(a) If a statement filed by electronic means of transmission is found to be incomplete or inaccurate after the examination of the statement for completeness and accuracy pursuant to division (B)(3)(a) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code, the entity that filed the statement shall file by electronic means of transmission any addendum to the statement that provides the information necessary to complete or correct the statement or, if required under that division, an amended statement. (b) Within five business days after the secretary of state receives an addendum to the statement or an amended statement by electronic or other means of transmission, the secretary of state shall make the contribution and expenditure information in the addendum or amended statement available online to the public through the internet as provided in division (G) of this section. (5) If a campaign committee for the office of member of the general assembly or a campaign committee of a candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals files a statement, addendum, or amended statement by printed version only with the appropriate board of elections, the campaign committee shall file two copies of the printed version of the statement, addendum, or amended statement with the board of elections. The board of elections shall send one of those copies by certified mail or an electronic copy to the secretary of state before the close of business on the day the board of elections receives the statement, addendum, or amended statement. (F)(1) The secretary of state, by rule adopted pursuant to section 3517.23 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe one or more techniques by which a person who executes and transmits to the secretary of state or a board of elections by electronic means a statement of contributions and expenditures, a statement of independent expenditures, a disclosure of electioneering communications statement, a deposit and disbursement statement, a gift and disbursement statement, or a donation and disbursement statement, an addendum to any of those statements, an amended statement of contributions and expenditures, an amended statement of independent expenditures, an amended disclosure of electioneering communications statement, an amended deposit and disbursement statement, an amended gift and disbursement statement, or an amended donation and disbursement statement, under this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall electronically sign the statement, addendum, or amended statement. Any technique prescribed by the secretary of state pursuant to this division shall create an electronic signature that satisfies all of the following: (a) It is unique to the signer. (b) It objectively identifies the signer. (c) It involves the use of a signature device or other means or method that is under the sole control of the signer and that cannot be readily duplicated or compromised. (d) It is created and linked to the electronic record to which it relates in a manner that, if the record or signature is intentionally or unintentionally changed after signing, the electronic signature is invalidated. (2) An electronic signature prescribed by the secretary of state under division (F)(1) of this section shall be attached to or associated with the statement of contributions and expenditures, the statement of independent expenditures, the disclosure of electioneering communications statement, the deposit and disbursement statement, the gift and disbursement statement, or the donation and disbursement statement, the addendum to any of those statements, the amended statement of contributions and expenditures, the amended statement of independent expenditures, the amended disclosure of electioneering communications statement, the amended deposit and disbursement statement, the amended gift and disbursement statement, or the amended donation and disbursement statement that is executed and transmitted by electronic means by the person to whom the electronic signature is attributed. The electronic signature that is attached to or associated with the statement, addendum, or amended statement under this division shall be binding on all persons and for all purposes under the campaign finance reporting law as if the signature had been handwritten in ink on a printed form. (G) The secretary of state shall make all of the following information available online to the public by any means that are searchable, viewable, and accessible through the internet: (1) The contribution and expenditure, the contribution and disbursement, the deposit and disbursement, the gift and disbursement, or the donation and disbursement information in all statements, all addenda to the statements, and all amended statements that are filed with the secretary of state by electronic or other means of transmission under this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, 3517.1014, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code; (2) The contribution and expenditure or the deposit and disbursement information in all statements that are filed with a board of elections by electronic means of transmission, and in all addenda to those statements and all amended versions of those statements, under this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 3517.1012, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) As used in this division, "library" means a library that is open to the public and that is one of the following: (a) A library that is maintained and regulated under section 715.13 of the Revised Code; (b) A library that is created, maintained, and regulated under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code. (2) The secretary of state shall notify all libraries of the location on the internet at which the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in campaign finance statements required to be made available online to the public through the internet pursuant to division (G) of this section may be accessed. If that location is part of the world wide web and if the secretary of state has notified a library of that world wide web location as required by this division, the library shall include a link to that world wide web location on each internet-connected computer it maintains that is accessible to the public. (3) If the system the secretary of state prescribes for the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section and divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code includes filing those statements through the internet via the world wide web, the secretary of state shall notify all libraries of the world wide web location at which those statements may be filed. If those statements may be filed through the internet via the world wide web and if the secretary of state has notified a library of that world wide web location as required by this division, the library shall include a link to that world wide web location on each internet-connected computer it maintains that is accessible to the public. (I) It is an affirmative defense to a complaint or charge brought against any campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party, any individual, partnership, or other entity, any person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or any treasurer of a transition fund, for the failure to file by electronic means of transmission a campaign finance statement as required by this section or section 3517.10, 3517.105, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code that all of the following apply to the campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or the treasurer of a transition fund that failed to so file: (1) The campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or the treasurer of a transition fund attempted to file by electronic means of transmission the required statement prior to the deadline set forth in the applicable section. (2) The campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or the treasurer of a transition fund was unable to file by electronic means of transmission due to an expected or unexpected shutdown of the whole or part of the electronic campaign finance statement-filing system, such as for maintenance or because of hardware, software, or network connection failure. (3) The campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party, the individual, partnership, or other entity, the person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or the treasurer of a transition fund filed by electronic means of transmission the required statement within a reasonable period of time after being unable to so file it under the circumstance described in division (I)(2) of this section. (J)(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to permit a campaign committee of a candidate for statewide office that makes expenditures of less than twenty-five thousand dollars during the filing period or a campaign committee for the office of member of the general assembly or the office of judge of a court of appeals that would otherwise be required to file campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission under division (E) of this section to file those statements by paper with the office of the secretary of state. Those rules shall provide for all of the following: (a) An eligible campaign committee that wishes to file a campaign finance statement by paper instead of by electronic means of transmission shall file the statement on paper with the office of the secretary of state not sooner than twenty-four hours after the end of the filing period set forth in section 3517.10 of the Revised Code that is covered by the applicable statement. (b) The statement shall be accompanied by a fee, the amount of which the secretary of state shall determine by rule. The amount of the fee established under this division shall not exceed the data entry and data verification costs the secretary of state will incur to convert the information on the statement to an electronic format as required under division (G) of this section. (c) The secretary of state shall arrange for the information in campaign finance statements filed pursuant to division (J) of this section to be made available online to the public through the internet in the same manner, and at the same times, as information is made available under divisions (E) and (G) of this section for candidates whose campaign committees file those statements by electronic means of transmission. (d) The candidate of an eligible campaign committee that intends to file a campaign finance statement pursuant to division (J) of this section shall file a notice indicating that the candidate's campaign committee intends to so file and stating that filing the statement by electronic means of transmission would constitute a hardship for the candidate or for the eligible campaign committee. (e) An eligible campaign committee that files a campaign finance statement on paper pursuant to division (J) of this section shall review the contribution and information made available online by the secretary of state with respect to that paper filing and shall notify the secretary of state of any errors with respect to that filing that appear in the data made available on that web site. (f) If an eligible campaign committee whose candidate has filed a notice in accordance with rules adopted under division (J)(1)(d) of this section subsequently fails to file that statement on paper by the applicable deadline established in rules adopted under division (J)(1)(a) of this section, penalties for the late filing of the campaign finance statement shall apply to that campaign committee for each day after that paper filing deadline, as if the campaign committee had filed the statement after the applicable deadline set forth in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (2) The process for permitting campaign committees that would otherwise be required to file campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission to file those statements on paper with the office of the secretary of state that is required to be developed under division (J)(1) of this section shall be in effect and available for use by eligible campaign committees for all campaign finance statements that are required to be filed on or after June 30, 2005. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, if the process the secretary of state is required to develop under division (L)(1) of this section is not in effect and available for use on and after June 30, 2005, all penalties for the failure of campaign committees to file campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission shall be suspended until such time as that process is in effect and available for use. (3) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, any eligible campaign committee that files campaign finance statements on paper with the office of the secretary of state pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section shall be deemed to have filed those campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state. Sec. 3517.108. (A) As used in divisions (A) and (B) of this section: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) A "general election period" begins on the day after the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which a candidate seeks an office specified in division (A)(1) of this section and ends on the thirty-first day of December following that general election. (3) A "primary election period" begins on the first day of January of the year following the year in which the general election was held for the office that the candidate seeks, including any mid-term election, and ends on the day of the primary election. (B) Whenever the campaign committee of a candidate has unpaid debt at the end of a primary election period or at the end of a general election period, the committee may accept additional contributions during the immediately following election period up to the applicable limitation prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code from any individual, political action committee, political contributing entity, or other campaign committee who, during the primary or general election period for which debt remains unpaid, has contributed less than the contribution limitations prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code applicable to that individual, political action committee, political contributing entity, or other campaign committee. Any additional contribution that a campaign committee accepts under this division shall count toward the applicable limitations prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code for that primary or general election period at the end of which the debt remains unpaid, and shall not count toward the applicable limitations for any other primary or general election period if all of the following conditions apply: (1) The campaign committee reports, on the statement required to be filed under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, all debt remaining unpaid at the end of the election period. The committee shall also file a separate statement, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, at the same time that the committee is required to file a statement of contributions and expenditures under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. The separate statement shall include the name and address of each contributor who makes an additional contribution under division (B) of this section, how the contribution was applied to pay the unpaid debt as required by division (B)(3) of this section, and the balance of the unpaid debt after each contribution was applied to it. (2) The additional contributions are accepted only during the primary or general election period, whichever is applicable, immediately following the election period covered in the statement filed under division (B)(1) of this section. (3) All additional contributions made under division (B) of this section are used by the campaign committee that receives them only to pay the debt of the committee reported under division (B)(1) of this section. (4) The campaign committee maintains a separate account for all additional contributions made under division (B) of this section and uses moneys in that account only to pay the unpaid debt reported under division (B)(1) of this section and to administer the account. (5) The campaign committee stops accepting additional contributions after funds sufficient to repay the unpaid debt reported under division (B)(1) of this section have been raised and promptly disposes of any contributions received that exceed the amount of the unpaid debt by returning the excess contributions to the contributors or by giving the excess contributions to an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), (4), (8), (10), or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 3517.109. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, tax commissioner, and member of the general assembly. (2) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, and attorney general. (3) "Senate candidate" means a candidate for the office of state senator. (4) "House candidate" means a candidate for the office of state representative. (5) "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, and member of the general assembly. (6) "Aggregate contribution" means the total of all contributions from a contributor during the pre-filing period. (7) "Allowable aggregate contribution" means all of the following: (a) In the case of a contribution from a contributor whose contributions are subject to the contribution limits described in division (B)(1), (2), (3), (6)(a), or (7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, that portion of the amount of the contributor's aggregate contribution that does not exceed the preprimary contribution limit applicable to that contributor. (b) In the case of a contribution or contributions from a contributor whose contributions are not subject to the contribution limits described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (6)(a), or (7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the total of the following: (i) That portion of the aggregate contribution that was received as in-kind services; (ii) That portion of the aggregate contribution that was received as cash and does not exceed the applicable preprimary cash transfer or contribution limits described in division (B)(6)(b) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. (8) "Excess aggregate contribution" means, for each contributor, the amount by which that contributor's aggregate contribution exceeds that contributor's allowable aggregate contribution. (9) "Pre-filing period" means the period of time ending on the day that the candidacy petitions are due for the state office for which the candidate has filed and beginning on the latest date of the following: (a) The first day of January of the year following the general election in which that state office was last on the ballot; (b) The first day of January of the year following the general election in which the candidate was last a candidate for any office; (c) The first day of the month following the primary election in which the candidate was last a candidate for any office. (10) "Filing date" means the last date on which a candidacy petition may be filed for an office. (11) "Applicable carry-in limit" means thirty-five thousand dollars if the candidate is a house candidate, one hundred thousand dollars if the candidate is a senate candidate, and two hundred thousand dollars if the candidate is a statewide candidate. (12) "Campaign asset" means prepaid, purchased, or donated assets available to the candidate on the date of the filing deadline for the office the candidate is seeking that will be consumed or depleted in the course of the candidate's election campaign, including, but not limited to, postage, prepaid rent for campaign headquarters, prepaid radio, television, and newspaper advertising, and other prepaid consulting and personal services. (13) "Permitted funds" means the sum of the following: (a) The total of the allowable aggregate contribution of each contributor; (b) The applicable carry-in limit. (14) "Excess funds" means the amount by which the sum of the total cash on hand and total reported campaign assets exceeds permitted funds. (15) "Covered candidate" means both of the following: (a) A candidate who, during the pre-filing period, accepts or has a campaign committee that accepts contributions on the candidate's behalf for the purpose of nominating or electing the candidate to any office not subject to the contribution limits prescribed in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code; (b) A person who, during the pre-filing period, accepts or has a campaign committee that accepts contributions on the person's behalf prior to the person deciding upon or announcing the office for which the person will become a candidate for nomination or election. (B) Each candidate who files for state office, not later than the filing date for that office, shall dispose of any excess funds. Each covered candidate who files for state office, not later than the filing date for that office, shall dispose of any excess aggregate contributions. (C) Any campaign committee that is required to dispose of excess funds or excess aggregate contributions under division (B) of this section shall dispose of that excess amount or amounts by doing any of the following: (1) Giving the amount to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio election integrity commission fund created under section 111.29 of the Revised Code; (2) Giving the amount to individuals who made contributions to that campaign committee as a refund of all or part of their contributions; (3) Giving the amount to a corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. (D)(1) Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, no candidate or covered candidate shall appear on the ballot, even if certified to appear on the ballot, unless the candidate's or covered candidate's campaign committee has disposed of excess funds, excess aggregate contributions, or both as required by divisions (B) and (C) of this section. (2) If the excess aggregate contributions accepted by a covered candidate or a covered candidate's campaign committee aggregate a total of less than five thousand dollars from all contributors, that candidate shall not be prohibited from appearing on the ballot under division (D)(1) of this section. (E)(1) The campaign committee of each candidate required to dispose of excess funds under this section shall file a report, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. The report shall be filed by the seventh day following the filing deadline for the office the candidate is seeking, shall indicate the amount of excess funds disposed of, and shall describe the manner in which the campaign committee disposed of the excess amount. (2) In addition to the information required to be included in a report filed under division (E)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of each covered candidate required to dispose of excess aggregate contributions under this section shall include in that report the source and amount of each excess aggregate contribution disposed of and shall describe the manner in which the campaign committee disposed of the excess amount. (F)(1) Each campaign committee of a candidate who has filed a declaration of candidacy or a nominating petition for a state office, not later than seven days after the filing date for the office the candidate is seeking, shall file a declaration of filing-day finances, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. (2) A declaration of filing-day finances shall list all of the following: (a) The amount of cash on hand in the candidate's campaign fund on the filing date for the office the candidate is seeking. (b) The value and description of all campaign assets worth five hundred dollars or more available to the candidate on the filing date. Assets purchased by the campaign shall be valued at actual cost, and in-kind contributions shall be valued at market value. (c) The total of all aggregate contributions; (d) The total of all allowable aggregate contributions; (e) The applicable carry-in limit, if any. (3) In addition to the information required to be included in a report of filing-day finances filed under division (F)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of each covered candidate shall include both of the following in that report: (a) The total of all excess aggregate contributions; (b) For each contributor, if any, for whom there is an excess aggregate contribution, the name, address, aggregate contribution, and excess aggregate contribution. (G) A campaign committee of a candidate is not required to file a declaration of filing-day finances under division (F) of this section if all of the following apply: (1) The campaign committee has not accepted, during the pre-filing period, any aggregate contribution greater than the applicable amount. (2) The campaign committee had less than the carry-in amount in cash on hand at the beginning of the pre-filing period. (3) The candidate files a declaration, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code not later than seven days after the filing date for the office that candidate is seeking, stating that the candidate's campaign committee has not accepted aggregate contributions as described in division (G)(1) of this section and has less than the carry-in amount in cash on hand as described in division (G)(2) of this section. Sec. 4503.033. (A) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, every deputy registrar shall file with the registrar of motor vehicles on a form prescribed by the registrar, a statement disclosing all of the following: (1) The name of the person filing the statement, and, if applicable, of his the person's spouse and of members of his the person's immediate family; (2) Any contribution made within the previous calendar year by the person and, if applicable, by his the person's spouse and by members of his the person's immediate family to each of the following: (a) Any political party; (b) Any candidate for the office of governor, attorney general, secretary of state, treasurer of state, auditor of state, tax commissioner, member of the senate or house of representatives of the general assembly, or to the campaign committee of any such candidate. (3) The month, day, and year in which the contribution was made; (4) The full name and address of each person, political party, or campaign committee to which a contribution was made; (5) The value in dollars and cents of the contribution. (B) No person shall knowingly fail to file, on or before the filing deadline under this section, a statement that is required by division (A) of this section. (C) No person shall knowingly make a false statement in a statement that is required to be filed under division (A) of this section. (D) On and after March 2, 1994, the statement required by division (A) of this section shall be accompanied by a filing fee of twenty-five dollars. If the statement required by division (A) of this section is not filed by the date on which it is required to be filed, the registrar of motor vehicles shall assess a late filing fee as prescribed in division (F) of section 102.02 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall deposit all fees he receives under this division into the general revenue fund of the state. (E) Not later than the date a deputy registrar is required to file a statement under division (A) of this section, the deputy registrar shall file a copy of the statement with the office of the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall keep the copies of all statements filed with his the office of the secretary of state under this division only for the purpose of making them available for public inspection. (F) Whoever violates division (B) of this section shall be fined one thousand dollars. Whoever violates division (C) of this section shall be fined ten thousand dollars. Sec. 5703.01. (A) There is hereby created the department of taxation which shall be composed of the tax commissioner and histhe tax commissioner's employees, agents, and representatives. Such commissioner shall perform such functions, exercise such powers, and discharge such duties as are assigned to himthe commissioner by law. (B) The tax commissioner shall be elected beginning in the general election of 2030, and quadrennially thereafter. The term of office of the tax commissioner shall commence on the second Monday of January next after the tax commissioner's election. Section 2. That existing sections 9.97, 101.70, 107.43, 113.40, 117.15, 121.03, 141.01, 141.011, 3505.03, 3505.33, 3505.35, 3513.052, 3513.10, 3517.092, 3517.10, 3517.102, 3517.103, 3517.104, 3517.106, 3517.108, 3517.109, 4503.033, and 5703.01 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Any Tax Commissioner serving before the effective date of this section may complete the Commissioner's appointed term. The Governor shall, with the advice and consent of the Senate, appoint a Tax Commissioner to serve as necessary until a successor takes office following the general election in 2030.